hypenator.xfst
clear stack

# define a set of words to experiment with
# this could be expanded so that we just define words as a regexp
# in a way that resemble Finnish words
#
read lexc test_lexicon.lexc

define Lexicon ;

define Vowel     a | e | i | o | u | y | ä | ö ;
define LongVowel     a a | e e | i i | o o | u u | y y | ä ä | ö ö ;
define Const 	b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v;

define AnyLetter [Vowel |  Const];

# Define words as any strings of letters so we can try out the hyphenator 
# with any word
define Word (AnyLetter)+ ;
regex Word ;

# In non-loan words 'd', 'j', 'v' cannot be at the end of a syllable
define LastConst Const - [d | j | v ];

define Diphthong 	a i | e i | o i | ä i | ö i | e y | ä y | ö y | a u | e u | o u | u i | y i | i u | i y | i e | u o | y ö ;


# Syllable structure for native words
define CV 	[ Const Vowel ];
define CVC	[ Const Vowel LastConst ];
define CVCC	[ Const Vowel Const LastConst ];
define CVV	[ Const Vowel Vowel ];
define CVVC	[ Const Vowel Vowel LastConst ];
define V	[ Vowel ];
define VC	[ Vowel LastConst ];
define VCC 	[ Vowel Const LastConst ];
define VV	[ LongVowel ];
define VVC	[ Vowel Vowel LastConst ];

# Syllable structures in loan words
define CCV	[ Const Const Vowel ];
define CCVC	[ Const Const Vowel Const ];
define CCVCC	[ Const Const Vowel Const Const ];
define CCVV	[ Const Const Vowel Vowel ];
define CCVVC 	[ Const Const Vowel Vowel Const ];
define sCCVC	[ 's' [Const Const Vowel Const ]];
define sCCVCC	[ 's' [Const Const Vowel Const Const ]];

define End [%- | %^];

define AllSyllables [
	# native word structures: 
	CVVC | CV | CVC | CVCC | CVV | VC | VCC | VVC | VV | V | 
	# loan word structures:
	CCV | CCVC | CCVCC | CCVV | CCVVC | sCCVC | sCCVCC  
];


###########################################################################
#
# The two basic rules from Institute for the Languages of Finland:
#
# derived from:
# http://www.kielitoimistonohjepankki.fi/haku/tavutus/ohje/153
###########################################################################
##
# Syllable border is always before a combination of consonant and a vowel
#
# 1) Tavuraja on aina konsonantin ja vokaalin yhdistelmän edellä
# 
# Adding AllSyllables in the context to prevent adding a hyphen to the
# beginning of the word
define syl [. .] -> %- || AllSyllables _ Const [ Vowel | Diphthong ] ; 

# Syllable border is between vowels that do not form a diphthong
# 2) Tavuraja on sellaisten eri vokaalien välissä, jotka eivät muodosta diftongia
define nonDiphthongSplit a -> a %- || _ [e | o | y ] .o.   # a-e, a-o, a-y
		       e -> e %- || _ [a | ä | o | y ] .o. # e-a, e-ä, e-o, e-y
		       i -> i %- || _ [a | o ] .o.         # i-a, i-o
                       o -> o %- || _ [a | e ] .o.         # o-a, o-e
                       u -> u %- || _ [a | e ] .o.         # u-a, u-e
                       ä -> ä %- || _ [ e ] .o.            # ä-e
                       0 -> 0; # zero rule to NOT forget the final ';'

#############################################################################
#
# Additional rules
#
#############################################################################
# Special cases for non-first diftongs, ie, uo, yö is not a diftong if they
# are not the first syllable of the word
#
# There are two versions of the rule:
#  - first for the 3rd or later syllables (e.g. kie-li-en)
#  - second for the second syllable (e.g säi-e)
#
# Eg pie-ni-en, #
define nonFirstDiphthonSplit i -> i %- || [%- AnyLetter+] _ e .o. # i-e
                             i -> i %- || AllSyllables _ e .o.    # i-e
                             u -> u %- || [%- AnyLetter+] _ o .o. # u-o
                             u -> u %- || AllSyllables _ o .o.    # u-o
                             y -> y %- || [%- AnyLetter+] _ ä .o. # y-ä
                             y -> y %- || AllSyllables _ ä .o.    # y-ä
                             y -> y %- || [%- AnyLetter+] _ ö .o. # y-ö
                             y -> y %- || AllSyllables _ ö .o.    # y-ö
                             0 -> 0; # zero rule to NOT forget the final ';'

#
# Some specific rules to match tricky cases for 1st and 2nd syllables in words like
# hams-traa-ja, abs-trak-ti, eks-tra
#
define longSyllableSplit     [. .] -> %- || VCC _ AllSyllables .o.
                             [. .] -> %- || CVC _ AllSyllables.o.
                             [. .] -> %- || CVCC _ AllSyllables.o.
                             0 -> 0; # zero rule to NOT forget the final ';'


#############################################################################
# 
# Compose the rules together
#
##############################################################################
define cleanup %^ -> 0 ;

regex Lexicon .o. 
# Rules:
        syl .o.
        nonDiphthongSplit .o.
        nonFirstDiphthonSplit .o.
	longSyllableSplit .o.
	cleanup
;
